District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.04

Powers of notaries public.

The Property Clerk is vested with all the powers conferred by law upon notaries public in the District.

History

R.S., D.C., § 411

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-155.
1973 Ed., § 4-154.